District of Columbia statutes.
2-1706

Maintenance of public records.

(a)

(1)

Any record created or received by the District in the course of official business is the property of the District and, except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, shall not be destroyed, sold, transferred, or disposed of in any manner.

(2)

(A)

A record may be destroyed, sold, transferred, or disposed of as prescribed by law, by records retention schedules, or by other authorization approved by the Committee; provided, that an authorization approved by the Committee shall not be effective until 45 days after its publication in the District of Columbia Register.

(B)

Any records retention schedule or procedure which is in effect on September 5, 1985, shall remain in effect until it is amended or repealed pursuant to this chapter.

(a-1)

No electronic mail shall be deleted or destroyed until new rules and regulations for the retention of electronic mail are submitted to and approved by the Council pursuant to § 2-1702(e). Such rules and regulations shall be submitted within 60 days of June 13, 2008.

(b)

It shall be the responsibility of each agency to develop:

(1)

Records containing adequate documentation of its organization, functions, policies, decisions, procedures, and essential transactions; and

(2)

A continuing program for the economical and efficient management of its records in compliance with the instructions and directives issued by the Administrator with respect to the organization, retention, disposal, storage, photographing, and microphotographing of its records.

(c)

An employee at each agency shall be designated as the records management officer of the agency, who shall develop and carry out the records management program of the agency and provide liaison with the Administrator.

(d)

Any inactive public record of the District which is deemed to have continuing historical or other significance shall be transferred to the District of Columbia Archives to be properly preserved, arranged, described, and made available for reference purposes.

Sept. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-19, § 7, 32 DCR 3590
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 131, 47 DCR 520
June 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-175, § 2(c), 55 DCR 5387
D.C. Law 17-175, in subsec. (a)(2)(A), inserted “; provided, that an authorization approved by the Committee shall not be effective until 45 days after its publication in the District of Columbia Register”; and added subsec. (a-1).
D.C. Law 13-91, in par. (2) of subsec. (b), deleted “pursuant to § 1-2902(d) 1981 Ed ,” preceding “with respect to”.
1981 Ed., § 1-2906.
This section is referenced in § 2-1701.